incubator/apertium-gld/apertium-gld.gld.twol
Alphabet

 а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н ӈ о п р с т у ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я  !!= * @CODE@
 А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н Ӈ О П Р С Т У Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я  !!= * @CODE@

!а̄ е̄ ӣ э̄ ӯ о̄
!А̄ Е̄ Ӣ ¯Э Ӯ О̄

 %{A%}:а %{A%}:э
 %{O%}:о %{O%}:у
 %{в%}:в %{в%}:б %{в%}:0
 %{б%}:б %{б%}:0 %{б%}:в
 %{I%}:й %{I%}:0
 %{н%}:н %{н%}:0
 %{д%}:д %{т%}:т
 %{к%}:к %{к%}:ч
 %{i%}:и %{i%}:0
 %{w%}:б %{w%}:в %{w%}:0
 %{р%}:р %{р%}:0
 %{й%}:0
 %{м%}:м
 %{п%}:п

 %{ː%}:̄   ! Length marker


 %{ъ%}:0  ! Low harmony
 %{ь%}:0  ! High harmony

 %-
 %>:0 
 %⊳:0

 ;

Sets

Vow = а е ё и о у ы э ю я 					
      А Е Ё И О У Ы Э Ю Я ; 

Cns = б в г д ж з й к л м н ӈ п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ь
      Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н Ӈ П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ь ;  

RealCns = б в г д ж з й к л м н ӈ п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ 
          Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н Ӈ П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ ; 

ArchiVow = %{A%} %{O%} ;

Len = %{ː%} ;

LowVow = а ё о я ;

HighVow = у ы э ю е ; 

NeutVow = и ;


Rules 

! н:н и:и {ː}:̄ ч:ч э:э н:н >:0 д:д и:и {A}:э д:д и:и

!огда<n><sg><abl>:огда>ди{A}ди
!огда<n><sg><obl>:огда>{в}{A}
!огда<n><pl><loc>:огда>с{A}л>д{O}л{A}

!ниичэн<n><sg><abl>:ни{ː}чэн>ди{A}ди
!ниичэн<n><sg><obl>:ни{ː}чэн>{в}{A}
!ниичэн<n><pl><loc>:ни{ː}чэн>с{A}л>д{O}л{A}

!ихон<n><pl><loc>:ихон>с{A}л>д{O}л{A}

! и:и х:х о:о н:н >:0 с:с {A}:а л:л >:0 д:д {O}:о л:л {A}:а


!@ б:б а:а {ː}:̄ >:0 р:р {A}:а {н}:0 >:0

"High harmony for {A}"
%{A%}:э <=> :HighVow (Len:) ([ Cns:0 | :Cns ]+ NeutVow*) [ %>: | %⊳: ] [ :Cns | NeutVow | :0 | Len: | :HighVow | %- ]* \%{й%}: _ ;
              %{ь%}: ([ Cns:0 | :Cns ]+ NeutVow*) [ %>: | %⊳: ] [ :Cns | NeutVow | :0 | Len: | :HighVow | %- | %{ь%}: ]* \%{й%}: _ ;

!@ д:д е:е п:0 >:0 {м}:м ч:ч {A}:э >:0

"Low harmony for {A}"
%{A%}:а <=> :LowVow (Len:) ([ Cns:0 | :Cns ]+ NeutVow*) [ %>: | %⊳: ] [ :Cns | NeutVow | :0 | Len: | :LowVow | %- ]* \%{й%}: _ ;
              %{ъ%}: ([ Cns:0 | :Cns ]+ NeutVow*) [ %>: | %⊳: ] [ :Cns | NeutVow | :0 | Len: | :LowVow | %- | %{ъ%}: ]* \%{й%}: _ ;

!@ б:б а:а л:л д:д и:и >:0 х:х {A}:а {н}:0 >:0 н:н и:и


"High harmony for {A} after {й}"
%{A%}:е <=> :HighVow (Len:) ([ Cns:0 | :Cns ]+ NeutVow*) [ %>: | %⊳: ] [ :Cns | NeutVow | :0 | Len: | :HighVow | %- ]* %{й%}: _ ;
              %{ь%}: ([ Cns:0 | :Cns ]+ NeutVow*) [ %>: | %⊳: ] [ :Cns | NeutVow | :0 | Len: | :HighVow | %- | %{ь%}: ]* %{й%}: _ ;

"Low harmony for {A} after {й}"
%{A%}:я <=> :LowVow (Len:) ([ Cns:0 | :Cns ]+ NeutVow*) [ %>: | %⊳: ] [ :Cns | NeutVow | :0 | Len: | :LowVow | %- ]* %{й%}: _ ;
              %{ъ%}: ([ Cns:0 | :Cns ]+ NeutVow*) [ %>: | %⊳: ] [ :Cns | NeutVow | :0 | Len: | :LowVow | %- | %{ъ%}: ]* %{й%}: _ ;
         
            
!! Note that vowel harmony is sometimes not completely attested in final syllable -{O} 


!@ д:д ё:ё б:б о:о >:0 д:д {й}:0 {A}:я >:0 {н}:м >:0 {б}:б и:и

!@ д:д ё:ё б:б о:о >:0 д:д {й}:0 {A}:я >:0 р:р {A}:а {н}:0 >:0 л:л


! х:х о:о н:н и:и >:0 -:- д:д {A}:а

! о:о г:г д:д а:а >:0 д:д и:и {A}:а д:д и:и

! о:о г:г д:д а:а >:0 п:п {O}:о >:0 в:в {A}:а 

"High harmony for {O}"
%{O%}:у <=> :HighVow (Len:) ([ Cns:0 | :Cns ]+ NeutVow*) [ %>: | %⊳: ] [ :Cns | NeutVow | :0 | Len: | :HighVow | %- ]* _ ;
              %{ь%}: (Len:) ([ Cns:0 | :Cns ]+ NeutVow*) [ %>: | %⊳: ] [ :Cns | NeutVow | :0 | Len: | :HighVow | %- | %{ь%}: ]* _ ;

!@ х:х у:у {ː}:̄ л:л >:0 {п}:п {O}:у >:0 г:г {O}:у >:0 {A}:э >:0 н:н и:и  

"Low harmony for {O}"
%{O%}:о <=> :LowVow  (Len:) ([ Cns:0 | :Cns ]+ NeutVow*) [ %>: | %⊳: ] [ :Cns | NeutVow | :0 | Len: | :LowVow | %- ]* _ ;
              %{ъ%}: (Len:) ([ Cns:0 | :Cns ]+ NeutVow*) [ %>: | %⊳: ] [ :Cns | NeutVow | :0 | Len: | :LowVow | %- | %{ъ%}: ]* _ ;


!"Vowel harmony for {O} in final syllable"
!%{O%}:у <=> [ :Cns* :RealCns ]/[ :0 | %- ]* _ .#. ;

"Intervocalic {в}"
%{в%}:в <=> [ :Vow | :й ] (%{ː%}:) [ %>: | %⊳: ] _ :Vow ; 

"Labialisation of {в}"
%{в%}:б <=> [ н: | л: ] [ %>: | %⊳: ] _ :Vow ; 

"Assimilation of н to м"
н:м <=> _ [ %>: | %⊳: ] [ :б | :п ]  ;

"Assimilation of present tense with sg1"
%{I%}:0 <=> _ [ %>: | %⊳: ] %{б%}: ;
           и: [ %>: | %⊳: ] _ ;
        except 
      .#. б и [ %>: | %⊳: ] _ [ %>: | %⊳: ] \%{б%}: ;

"Only with verb би-"
%{I%}:и <=> .#. б и [ %>: | %⊳: ] _ [ %>: | %⊳: ] \%{б%}: ;

"н surfaces before б" 
%{н%}:м <=> _ [ %>: | %⊳: ] %{б%}:  ;
      except
          :н [ %>: | %⊳: ] _ ;

"н deletes everywhere there is no б"
%{н%}:0 <=>      _ [ %>: | %⊳: ] \%{б%}: ; 
          :н [ %>: | %⊳: ] _ ;
           _ .#. ;

"{к} is ч after vowel"
%{к%}:ч <=> :Vow (%{ː%}:) [ %>: | %⊳: ] _ ;
                        п [ %>: | %⊳: ] _ ; 

!@ д:д е:е п:п >:0 {к}:ч {A}:э 

"Never delete {i} with surface Cns"
%{i%}:и <=> :Cns _ ; 
           :и [ %>: | %⊳: ] %{б%}: _ ; 
           [ :Vow - :и ] [ %>: | %⊳: ] %{I%}: [ %>: | %⊳: ] %{б%}: _ ; 

"{w} deletion"
%{w%}:0 <=> [ :Vow - [ :о | :у ] ] ([ %{ь%}: | %{ъ%}: ]) [ %>: | %⊳: ] _  ; 


"Surface {р} if there is no following syllabic morpheme"
%{р%}:р <=> _ %{A%}: %{н%}: [ %>: | %⊳: ] (Cns:) .#. ; 


!@ д:д ё:ё б:б о:о >:0 {р}:р {A}:а {н}:0 >:0

!@ д:д ё:ё б:б о:о >:0 {р}:0 {A}:а {н}:м >:0 {б}:б и:и


!@ б:б а:а {ː}:̄ >:0 р:р {A}:а {н}:0 >:0

!@ б:б а:а {ː}:̄  >:0 р:р {A}:а {н}:м >:0 {б}:б и:и

"{д} devoicing after п"
%{д%}:т <=> п: [ %>: | %⊳: ] _ ; 

"Stem final -п- voices before д {й}"
п:б <=> _ [ %>: | %⊳: ] д %{й%}:  ; 

!@ д:д е:е п:б >:0 д:д {й}:0 {A}:е >:0 р:р {A}:э {н}:0

"Labial stem final consonant deletes in subjunctive"
Cx:0 <=> _ [ %>: | %⊳: ] %{м%}: ч ; 
      where Cx in ( п л н р ) ; 

"Labial stem final consonant deletes in simultaneous"
Cx:0 <=> _ [ %>: | %⊳: ] %{м%}: и ; 
      where Cx in ( п н ) ; 

"Stem final п deletes in conditional"
п:0 <=> _ [ %>: | %⊳: ] %{п%}: ;

!@ д:д е:е п:0 >:0 {м}:м ч:ч {A}:э >:0

"б in sg1 only surfaces after a consonant"
%{б%}:б <=> :Cns [ %>: | %⊳: ] _ ; 

"In possessives, the {б} surfaces as в"
%{б%}:в <=> [ :* - [ %>: | %⊳: ] ]+ Vow: [ %>: | %⊳: ] _  ;

!@ п:п и:и к:к т:т э:э >:0 {б}:в {A}:э р:р и:и 

!@ о:о г:г д:д а:а >:0 {б}:в {A}:а р:р и:и


!@ у:у н:м >:0 {п}:п {O}:у >:0 г:г {O}:у >:0 {A}:э >:0 н:н и:и
